Massachusetts, session 194th, H108.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 132B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Nematode” the following
definition:-
“Neonicotinoid,” a pesticide belonging to the neonicotinoid class of chemicals which act
selectively on nicotine acetylcholine receptors of organisms and are absorbed into plant tissue
and can be present in pollen and nectar, including but not limited to, imidacloprid, acetamiprid,
clothianidin, dinotefuran, nithiazine, nitenpyram, thiacloprid, and thiamethoxam and any other
pesticide identified as a neonicotinoid by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of said chapter 132B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:-
of 3

No person shall distribute a neonicotinoid, or any substance containing a neonicotinoid,
except a neonicotinoid-treated nursery plant, to any person except a certified commercial
applicator, a certified private applicator, or a licensed applicator.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 132B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 6K the following section:-
Section 6L. (a) Neonicotinoids shall only be sprayed, released, deposited or applied on
any property within the commonwealth by a certified commercial applicator, certified private
applicator or licensed applicator.
(b) Upon entering into an agreement to provide services that include application of
neonicotinoids, a certified commercial applicator, certified private applicator, or licensed
applicator shall provide to property owners the following: (i) a form authorizing the applicator to
apply neonicotinoids; (ii) a copy of any warning statements concerning bees on the label of
neonicotinoids being applied; (iii) notice of the harm neonicotinoids cause to waterways, soils,
and the flora and fauna that inhabit such environments; and (iv) an acknowledgment signifying
that the owner has received and understands this information. This subsection shall not apply to
any certified commercial applicator, certified private applicator, or licensed applicator using a
neonicotinoid on property that he or she owns.
(c) The subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to the following products: (i) pet care
products used to mitigate fleas, mites, ticks, heartworms, or other animals that are harmful to the
health of a domesticated animal; (ii) personal care products used to mitigate lice and bedbugs;
(iii) indoor pest control products used to mitigate insects indoors, including ant bait and (iv) any
of 3

products used by licensed or certified applicators for use in industrial, institutional, structural and
health related pest control, as defined in 333 CMR 10.03.7.
SECTION 4. Section 10 of said chapter 132B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting in line 61 after the word “management” the following words:- and the protection of
pollinators from adverse effects of pesticide applications.
SECTION 5. Section 14 of said chapter 132B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “inclusive”, in lines 9 and 10, the following words:- , section 6L.
SECTION 6. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall identify
opportunities in the commonwealth for the replacement of non-native, cool-season turf grasses
around solar energy installations on property owned by the department with native plant
communities that include flowers, wildflowers, vegetables, herbs, cover crops and legume
species to attract pollinators.
of 3